Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1153.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 402. Imposition of Tax.--* * *(d) (1) The privileges described in subsection (a)(1) and (2) do not include work performed by employes of the corporation:(i) who are residents of this Commonwealth;(ii) whose primary work location for the corporation, within 12345678910111213141516171819202122 the meaning of 61 Pa. Code Ch. 153 (relating to corporate net income tax), is in another state or the District of Columbia; and(iii) who work remotely in this Commonwealth less than fifty per cent of their normal working hours on an annual basis.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect the right of a taxpayer to apportionment of income as provided in section 401(3)2(a)(3).Section 2. The regulation at 61 Pa. Code § 153.23(b) is abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2023.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1153PN1412 - 2 - 12345678910111213